District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Personal Delivery Device Weight Limit Congressional Review Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Personal Delivery Device Act of 2018, effective July 17, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-
137; D.C. Official Code § 50-110.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2(8)(B) (D.C. Official Code § 50-110.01(8)(B)) is repealed.
(b) Section 4(b) (D.C. Official Code § 50-110.03(b)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and”
in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
“(6) Not exceed 250 pounds in weight, excluding any property being carried by the
PDD, or a higher weight limit established by the Department through rulemaking.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2